Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

General Provisions

54-10-101. Public roads and ferries.

All roads and ferries laid out or appointed agreeably to law are to be deemed public roads and ferries.

Code 1858, § 1182 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 1; 1819, ch. 26, § 1); Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 1; integrated in Shan., § 1617; Code 1932, § 2727; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-901.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 71; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, §§ 2, 8.

Attorney General Opinions. A city or county may not charge a toll or fee on a county or state highway or at the border with another state without express legislative authority, OAG 01-143 (9/4/01).

Comparative Legislation. Establishment of public roads:

Ala. Code § 11-3-10.

Ark. Code § 27-66-202 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-1-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 180.010 et seq.; § 184.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-7-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 228.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-44.1; § 136-82.

Va. Code § 33.1-25 et seq.

Cited: Henry County v. Summers, 547 S.W.2d 247, 1976 Tenn. App. LEXIS 227 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1976).

54-10-102. Power of county legislative body.

The county legislative body has the power to build, repair, and maintain bridges and highways, and pay for the building, repair, and maintenance of bridges and highways out of general county funds, and, through commissioners and a superintendent of the county jail or workhouse, has the power to work certain inmates upon any public highway, with the aid and superintendence of the local commissioner and overseer, or independently of them.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 44; Shan., § 1707; mod. Code 1932, § 3016; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-902.

Cross-References. Bridges over rivers through county seat towns, §§ 54-11-219 — 54-11-221.

Commissioners contracting for repair of bridges, § 54-11-225.

Prison labor, § 54-5-128.

Survey of roads to ascertain needed improvements, § 54-10-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, §§ 4, 5; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State, and County Securities, § 4.

Cited: Cannon County v. McConnell, 152 Tenn. 555, 280 S.W. 24, 1925 Tenn. LEXIS 101 (1926).

54-10-103. Classification of roads.

The county legislative bodies shall classify the public roads in the counties, but shall not divide them into more than four (4) classes of widths, as described in § 54-10-104, and shall specify in each class the width of roadbed between ditches and the distance between fences, which dimensions shall be within § 54-10-104, and which classification shall be entered of record in the office of the county clerk in a book to be kept for that purpose.

Before the county legislative body may classify a road as provided in this section, the chief administrative officer of the county highway department shall submit a listing of all county roads to the county legislative body. The listing shall include a summary of all changes from the road listing submitted previously. The summary shall provide the road name, date the change was approved by the county legislative body and the reason for the change, including, but not limited to, opening, closing, reduction or extension in length, or correction of error. The chief administrative officer of the county highway department shall also include recommendations for classifying the roads.

Code 1858, § 1183; Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 11; integrated in Shan., § 1618; Code 1932, § 2728; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-903; Acts 1987, ch. 16, § 1; 1997, ch. 80, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, §§ 35, 36.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted “at a January session” preceding “, but shall not divide” in (a); and substituted “previously” for “the previous year” at the end of the second sentence in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Width and character of highways in municipalities, § 54-5-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 30.

Attorney General Opinions. County highway superintendent's duties, OAG 99-005 (1/25/99).

A county has no authority to assume control of a state road that lies within the boundaries of a state park or state forest and place it on its list of county roads under T.C.A. § 54-10-103, or under any other provision of Title 54 of the Code; such roads are under the control of the state, OAG 00-100 (5/24/00).

54-10-104. Classes and specifications of roads — Working and grading.

All roads laid off and worked under this chapter shall be known and classified as roads of the first, second, third and fourth class.

Roads of the first class shall be not more than one hundred feet (100') nor less than twenty-four feet (24') wide; roads of the second class, not more than forty feet (40') nor less than eighteen feet (18') wide; roads of the third class, not more than thirty feet (30') nor less than fourteen feet (14') wide; and roads of the fourth class, not more than twenty feet (20') nor less than ten feet (10') wide.

All roads of the first class shall have worked a roadbed of at least twenty feet (20') as the minimum width for first class roads, sixteen feet (16') for roads of the second class, twelve feet (12') for roads of the third class, and eight feet (8') for roads of the fourth class; and, in constructing the roadbed, concrete, broken stones or gravel or other material approved by the department of transportation shall be used, when concrete, broken stones, gravel or other approved material can be conveniently obtained, to form the surface; provided, that where it is possible and practicable, the roadbeds shall be graded with a fall of one inch (1") to the foot from the center of road to the ditches.

Overseers shall also maintain ditches at each side of the roadbed adequate to drain the roadbed.

The county legislative body may require sections of roads near populous cities to have roadbeds graded to any width not beyond the maximum width allowed in this section for all roads of the class; and when the condition of the road requires it, timbers shall be employed to construct the roadbed in whatever way the commissioner may direct, and, if practicable, the commissioner may have wet or spouty places underdrained by tile draining.

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 26; Shan., § 1619; mod. Code 1932, § 2729; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-904; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Width and character of highways in municipalities, § 54-5-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 30.

Cited: Vinson v. Nashville, C. & S. L. Ry., 45 Tenn. App. 161, 321 S.W.2d 841, 1958 Tenn. App. LEXIS 120 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1958).

54-10-105. Survey of roads to ascertain needed improvements — Estimates.

Any county legislative body, a majority of the members assenting, may elect or appoint three (3) commissioners authorized to employ engineers and other necessary and expert service to survey, inspect, and classify all roads that have already been laid off or accepted by the county as public roads, and make maps and charts of the roads, showing the changes and improvements that public interest requires to be made on the roads.

The employed personnel and necessary and expert service may also survey, inspect, lay off, and classify any new road or roads, or extension of old roads that, in the opinion of the commission, the public welfare requires to be opened or extended.

The improvements authorized by this section include grading, filling, extending, metaling, ditching, widening, bridging, draining and ditching, piping, sewering, and crossings of roads, as well as all necessary material required in the construction of the road, roads, and crossings.

The commission shall ascertain and report in detail the probable or approximate cost of making the improvements, together with the probable damages that will be done to adjacent lands by the changes.

Acts 1891, ch. 211, § 1; Shan., § 1686; Code 1932, § 2959; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-920.

54-10-106. Report of acts and recommendations.

The commission shall make a full report of its acts and recommendations to the county legislative body quarterly, attaching to the report maps, charts, plans, and specifications, itemized and showing in detail the estimated costs of the proposed improvements.

Acts 1891, ch. 211, § 2; Shan., § 1687; Code 1932, § 2960; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-921.

54-10-107. Adoption and recording of report.

When the report of the commission is submitted to the county legislative body, the county legislative body shall take a vote on the report, and, if a majority of the members vote for adopting the report of the commissioners, the vote shall be entered of record and the report spread upon the minutes.

Acts 1891, ch. 211, § 3; Shan., § 1688; Code 1932, § 2961; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-922.

54-10-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1889, ch. 148, § 1; Shan., § 1683; Code 1932, § 2956; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-923; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 37, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-10-108 concerned erection of gates across public roads.

54-10-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1889, ch. 148, § 2; Shan., § 1684; Code 1932, § 2957; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-924; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 37, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-10-109 concerned kinds and maintenance of gates.

54-10-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 29; Shan., § 1677; mod. Code 1932, § 2804; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-925; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 37, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-10-110 concerned fines and penalties of obstruction of roads.

54-10-111. Designation of bicycle routes.

The county legislative body of each county may designate and appropriately mark on appropriate county roads, or portions of county roads, routes for the use of bicycles.

Acts 1994, ch. 909, § 3.

Cross-References. Designation of bicycle routes, §§ 54-5-142, 54-5-211.

54-10-112. Possession of municipal or county traffic control sign prohibited.

The possession of a municipal or county traffic control sign erected upon any municipal or county street, road or highway by any person who is not an employee of a municipal or county highway department, or who has not entered into a contract with a municipality or county for the sale or erection of a traffic control sign, is a Class B misdemeanor punishable by a fine only of no more than five hundred dollars ($500). The possession of each traffic control sign in violation of this section shall be considered a separate offense.

This section shall only apply to a municipal or county traffic control sign that contains markings or other form of identification on the traffic control sign indicating the municipality or county that erected or caused to be erected the sign, and the date the sign was acquired or erected by the municipality or county.

In addition to the fine provided for in subsection (a), any person convicted of a violation of this section shall also be required to pay restitution to the highway department that erected or caused to be erected the traffic control sign, for the costs of replacing the sign. The highway department shall submit information documenting the costs of replacement for the judge to review. After review, the judge shall order the appropriate amount of restitution, which shall be distributed directly to the highway department.

This section shall only apply to municipal or county traffic control signs that are acquired or erected after July 1, 1998.

Acts 1998, ch. 917, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Vandalism of state highway structures, § 54-1-134.

54-10-113. Possession of municipal or county street, road or highway sign prohibited.

The possession of a municipal or county street, road or highway sign erected upon any municipal or county street, road or highway by any person who is not an employee of a municipal or county highway department, or who has not entered into a contract with a municipality or county for the sale or erection of a street, road or highway sign, is a Class B misdemeanor punishable by a fine only of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). The possession of each street, road or highway sign in violation of this section shall be considered a separate offense.

This section shall only apply to a municipal or county road, street or highway sign that contains markings or other form of identification on the sign indicating the municipality or county that erected or caused to be erected the sign, and the date the sign was acquired or erected by such municipality or county.

In addition to the fine provided for in subsection (a), any person convicted of a violation of this section shall also be required to pay restitution to the highway department that erected or caused to be erected the street, road or highway sign, for the costs of replacing the sign. The highway department shall submit information documenting the costs of replacement for the judge to review. After review, the judge shall order the appropriate amount of restitution, which shall be distributed directly to the highway department.

This section shall only apply to municipal or county street, road or highway signs that are acquired or erected after July 1, 1998.

Acts 1998, ch. 917, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Vandalism of state highway structures, § 54-1-134.